Massachusetts, session 194th, S1991.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commissioner of the department of revenue, for three months, shall forgo collection of the tax
per gallon as defined by section 1 of chapter 64A of the General Laws of motor vehicle fuel
excise at such time as (i) the average price of one gallon of unleaded gasoline, as calculated in
the Commonwealth of Massachusetts by the U.S. Energy Information Administration, is greater
than three dollars and fifty cents and whose price increases by no less than ten percent in a period
of one month, (ii) one gallon of diesel gasoline, as calculated in the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts by the U.S. Energy Information Administration, is greater than four dollars and
whose price increases by no less than ten percent in a period of one month.
of 2

SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary not more than 30
days following the resumption of the collection of the tax per gallon on motor vehicle fuel
excise, the commissioner of the department of revenue shall certify to the comptroller of the
commonwealth the amount of tax per gallon not collected and the comptroller shall transfer the
certified amount from the general fund to the state transportation fund.
of 2